Georgia, session 2025_26, HB556.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 52-7-8.3 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to operation of
watercraft, identification, and operation by minors, is amended by revising subsection (g) as
follows:
"(g)(1) As used in this subsection, the term 'course' means a rental education course as
provided for in paragraph (3) of this subsection. No person shall rent, lease, or let for hire
any vessel ten horsepower or more to any person under 16 years of age. On and after
July 1, 2014, a person 16 years of age or older may rent or lease any vessel ten
horsepower or more if such person has completed a boating education course approved
by the department. This subsection shall not apply to any person licensed by the United
States Coast Guard as a master of a vessel or a nonresident who has in his or her
H. B. 556 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 44 3123S
possession proof that he or she has completed a National Association of State Boating
Law Administrators approved boater education course or equivalency examination from
another state.
(2) No person shall rent, lease, or let for hire any vessel ten horsepower or more to any
person under 18 years of age. No person shall operate a vessel that has been rented,
leased, or let for hire unless such person is 18 years of age or older and has completed a
rental education course approved by the department. A person 18 years of age or older
may rent, lease, or let for hire a vessel ten horsepower or more if such person has
completed a rental education course approved by the department. No person may rent,
lease, or let for hire a vessel ten horsepower or more to a person 18 years of age or older
unless such person has completed a rental education course approved by the department
and, if one or more additional persons 18 years or age or older will be present on such
vessel, at least one additional person has completed such course.
(3) Rental education courses provided pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection must
be approved by the department and must result in the issuance of a rental education
certificate upon successful completion of the course. Rental education certificates shall
be effective for six months after the date of issuance and shall be valid anywhere in this
state. Boat liveries shall use course materials approved by the department. At a
minimum, a course must consist of a ten-minute operation familiarization video followed
by a renter orientation checklist. Such video must address the following topics in order
to be approved:
(A) Operator responsibility, ethics, courtesy, and good judgment on the water;
(B) Safety equipment;
(C) Navigation rules;
(D) Aids to navigation, and buoys and other waterway markers; and
(E) Proper identification.
H. B. 556 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 44 3123S
(4) The requirement to complete a course does not apply to any person licensed by the
United States Coast Guard as a master of a vessel, any person who has in his or her
possession a valid boater education identification card showing that he or she has
completed a boating education course approved by the department, or a person who has
in his or her possession proof that he or she has completed a National Association of State
Boating Law Administrators approved boater education course or equivalency
examination from another state.
(5) Any person who violates this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 556 (SUB)
- 3 -